Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3243.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The town of Portsmouth is hereby empowered, in addition to authority
previously granted, to issue bonds in an amount not exceeding forty-one million dollars
($41,000,000) from time to time under its corporate name and seal; provided, however, that bonds
shall not be issued unless the conditions of section 2 hereof as to the level of state aid are met. The
bonds of each issue may be issued in the form of zero coupon bonds, capital appreciation bonds,
serial bonds or term bonds or a combination thereof and shall be payable either by maturity of
principal in the case of serial bonds or by mandatory serial redemption in the case of term bonds,
in installments of principal, the first installment to be not later than five (5) years and the last
installment not later than thirty (30) years after the date the bonds are issued.
SECTION 2. This act shall constitute an enabling act of the general assembly that is
required pursuant to § 16-7-44. Any bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued under
this act for school projects shall not be eligible for state housing aid reimbursement pursuant to §
16-7-44 unless the school projects described herein have been approved by the Rhode Island
department of education.
SECTION 3. The bonds shall be signed by the president of the town council, the town
administrator and the director of finance and shall be issued and sold in such amounts as the town
council may authorize. The manner of sale, denominations, maturities, interest rates and other

terms, conditions and details of any bonds or notes issued under this act may be fixed by the
proceedings of the town council authorizing the issue or by separate resolution of the town council
or, to the extent provisions for these matters are not so made, they may be fixed by the officers
authorized to sign the bonds or notes. Notwithstanding anything contained in this act to the
contrary, the town may enter into financing agreements with the Rhode Island health and
educational building corporation pursuant to chapter 7 of title 16 and chapter 38.1 of title 45 and,
with respect to bonds or notes issued in connection with such financing agreements, if any, the
town may elect to have the provisions of chapter 38.1 of title 45 apply to the issuance of the bonds
or notes issued hereunder to the extent the provisions of chapter 38.1 of title 45 are inconsistent
herewith. In addition, the town may enter into financing agreements with the Rhode Island
infrastructure bank pursuant to the provisions of chapter 12.2 of title 46 and, with respect to bonds
or notes issued in connection with such financing agreements, if any, the town may elect to have
the provisions of chapter 12.2 of title 46 apply to the issuance of the bonds or notes issued hereunder
to the extent the provisions of chapter 12.2 of title 46 are inconsistent herewith. Such election may
be fixed by the proceedings of the town council authorizing such issuance of by separate resolution
of the town council, or, to the extent provisions for these matters are not so made, they may be
fixed by the officers authorized to sign the bonds or notes. The proceeds derived from the sale of
the bonds shall be delivered to the director of finance, and such proceeds exclusive of accrued
interest shall be expended:
(1) For the construction, additions, renovation, improvement, alteration, repair furnishing
and equipping of schools and school facilities in the Town and all costs related thereto;
(2) For payment of the principal or interest on temporary notes issued under section 4;
(3) In payment of capitalized interest on bonds or notes;
(4) In repayment of advances under section 5; or
(5) In payment of related costs of issuance of any bonds or notes. No purchaser of any
bonds or notes under this act shall be in any way responsible for the proper application of the
proceeds derived from the sales thereof. The project shall be carried out and all contracts made
therefore on behalf of the town by the town administrator, subject to approval of the town council.
The proceeds of bonds or notes issued under this act, any applicable federal or state assistance and
other monies referred to in sections 7 and 10, shall be deemed appropriated for the purposes of this
act without further action than that required by this act. The bond issue authorized by this act may
be consolidated for the purposes of issuance and sale with any other bond issue of the town
heretofore or hereafter authorized; provided that, notwithstanding any such consolidation, the
proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized by this act shall be expended for the purposes set
LC006382 - Page 2 of 7

forth above.
SECTION 4. The town council may by resolution authorize the issue from time to time of
interest bearing or discounted notes in anticipation of the issue of bonds or in anticipation of the
receipt of federal or state aid for the purposes of this act. The amount of original notes issued in
anticipation of bonds may not exceed the amount of bonds which may be issued under this act, and
the amount of original notes issued in anticipation of federal or state aid may not exceed the amount
of available federal or state aid as estimated by the director of finance. Temporary notes issued
hereunder shall be signed by the manual or facsimile signatures of the director of finance, the town
administrator and the president of the town council and shall be payable within five (5) years from
their respective dates, but the principal of and interest on notes issued for a shorter period may be
renewed or paid from time to time by the issue of other notes thereunder, provided the period from
the date of an original note to the maturity or any note issued to renew or pay the same debt or the
interest thereon shall not exceed five (5) years. Any temporary notes in anticipation of bonds issued
under this section may be refunded prior to the maturity of the notes by the issuance of additional
temporary notes; provided that, no such refunding shall result in any amount of such temporary
notes outstanding at any one time in excess of two hundred percent (200%) of the amount of bonds
which may be issued under this act; and provided, further, that if the issuance of any such refunding
notes results in any amount of such temporary notes outstanding at any one time in excess of the
amount of bonds which may be issued under this act, the proceeds of such refunding notes shall be
deposited in a separate fund established with the bank which is paying agent for the notes being
refunded. Pending their use to pay the notes being refunded, monies in the fund shall be invested
for the benefit of the town by the paying agent at the direction of the director of finance in any
investment permitted under section 5. The monies in the fund and any investments held as a part
of the fund shall be held in trust and shall be applied by the paying agent solely to the payment or
prepayment of the principal of and interest on the notes being refunded. Upon payment of all
principal of and interest on the notes, any excess monies in the fund shall be distributed to the town.
The town may pay the principal of and interest on notes in full from other than the issuance of
refunding notes prior to the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 1 hereof. In such case, the town’s
authority to issue bonds or notes in anticipation of bonds under this act shall continue provided
that: (1) The town council passes a resolution evidencing the town’s intent to pay off the notes
without extinguishing the authority to issue bonds or notes; and (2) That the period from the date
of an original note to the maturity date of any other note shall not exceed five (5) years.
SECTION 5. Pending any authorization or issue of bonds hereunder or pending or in lieu
of any authorization or issue of notes hereunder, the director of finance, with the approval of the
LC006382 - Page 3 of 7

town council, may, to the extent that bonds or notes may be issued hereunder, apply funds in the
treasury of the town to the purposes specified in section 2, such advances to be repaid without
interest from the proceeds of bonds or notes subsequently issued or from the proceeds of applicable
federal or state assistance or from other available funds.
SECTION 6. Any proceeds of bonds or notes issued hereunder or of any applicable federal
or state assistance, pending their expenditure, may be deposited or invested by the director of
finance in demand deposits, time deposits or savings deposits in banks which are members of the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or in obligations issued or guaranteed by the United States
of America or by any agency or instrumentality thereof or as may be provided in any other
applicable law of the State of Rhode Island or resolution of the town council or pursuant to an
investment policy of the town.
SECTION 7. Any accrued interest received upon the sale of bonds or notes hereunder shall
be applied to the payment of the first interest due thereon. Any premiums arising from the sale of
bonds or notes hereunder and any earnings or net profit realized from the deposit or investment of
funds hereunder shall, in the discretion of the director of finance, be applied to the cost of preparing,
issuing, and marketing bonds or notes hereunder to the extent not otherwise provided, to the
payment of the cost of the project, to the payment of the principal of or interest on bonds or notes
issued hereunder or to any one or more of the foregoing. The cost of preparing, issuing and
marketing bonds or notes hereunder may also, in the discretion of the director of finance, be met
from bond or note proceeds exclusive of accrued interest or from other monies available therefor.
Any balance of bond or note proceeds remaining after payment of the cost of the projects and the
cost of preparing, issuing and marketing bonds or notes hereunder shall be applied to the payment
of the principal of or interest on bonds or notes issued hereunder. To the extent permitted by
applicable federal laws, any earnings or net profit realized from the deposit or investment of funds
hereunder may, upon receipt, be added to and dealt with as part of the revenues of the town from
property taxes. In exercising any discretion under this section, the director of finance shall be
governed by any instructions adopted by resolution of the town council.
SECTION 8. All bonds and notes issued under this act and the debts evidenced thereby
shall be obligatory on the town in the same manner and to the same extent as other debts lawfully
contracted by it and shall be excepted from the operation of § 45-12-2. No such obligation shall at
any time be included in the debt of the town for the purpose of ascertaining its borrowing capacity.
The town shall annually appropriate a sum sufficient to pay the principal and interest coming due
within the year on bonds and notes issued hereunder to the extent that monies therefor are not
otherwise provided. If such sum is not appropriated, it shall nevertheless be added to the annual tax
LC006382 - Page 4 of 7

levy. In order to provide such sum in each year and notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, all taxable property in the town shall be subject to ad valorem taxation by the town without
limitation as to rate or amount.
SECTION 9. Any bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this act, if properly
executed by officers of the town in office on the date of execution, shall be valid and binding
according to their terms notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor any
or all of such officers shall for any reason have ceased to hold office.
SECTION 10. The town, acting by resolution of its town council is authorized to apply for,
contract for and expend any federal or state advances or other grants or assistance which may be
available for the purposes of this act, and any such expenditures may be in addition to other monies
provided in this act. To the extent of any inconsistency between any law of this state and any
applicable federal law or regulation, the latter shall prevail. Federal and state advances, with interest
where applicable, whether contracted for prior to or after the effective date of this act, may be
repaid as project costs under section 2.
SECTION 11. Bonds and notes may be issued under this act without obtaining the approval
of any governmental agency or the taking of any proceedings or the happening of any conditions
except as specifically required by this act for such issue. In carrying out any project financed in
whole or in part under this act, including where applicable the condemnation of any land or interest
in land, and in the levy and collection of assessments or other charges permitted by law on account
of any such project, all action shall be taken which is necessary to meet constitutional requirements
whether or not such action is otherwise required by statute; but the validity of bonds and notes
issued hereunder shall in no way depend upon the validity or occurrence of such action.
SECTION 12. All or any portion of the authority to issue bonds and notes under this act
may be extinguished by resolution of the town council, without further action by the general
assembly seven (7) years after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 13. The director of finance, the town administrator and the president of the town
council, on behalf of the town, are hereby authorized to execute such documents or other papers as
either of them deem necessary or desirable to carry out the intent of this act and are also authorized
to take all actions and execute all documents or agreements necessary to comply with federal tax
and securities laws, which documents or agreements may have a term coextensive with the maturity
of the bonds authorized hereby, including Rule 15c2-12 of the Securities and Exchange
Commission (the "Rule") and to execute and deliver a continuing disclosure agreement or
certificate in connection with the bonds or notes in the form as shall be deemed advisable by such
officers in order to comply with the Rule.
LC006382 - Page 5 of 7

SECTION 14. The question of the approval of this act shall be submitted to the electors of
the town at the next general election on November 3, 2026 or at a special election (other than a
primary), on a date as shall be designated by the town council. The question shall be submitted in
substantially the following form: “Shall an Act, passed at the 2026 session of the General
Assembly, entitled, ‘AN ACT AUTHORIZING THE TOWN OF PORTSMOUTH TO ISSUE
NOT TO EXCEED $41,000,000 GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS, NOTES AND OTHER
EVIDENCES OF INDEBTEDNESS TO FINANCE THE CONSTRUCTION, ADDITIONS,
RENOVATION, IMPROVEMENT, ALTERATION, REPAIR, FURNISHING AND
EQUIPPING OF SCHOOLS AND SCHOOL FACILITIES THROUGHOUT THE TOWN' be
approved?" and the warning for the election shall contain the question to be submitted. From the
time the election is warned and until it is held, it shall be the duty of the town clerk to keep a copy
of the act available at the town clerk’s office for public inspection, but the validity of the election
shall not be affected by this requirement.
SECTION 15. This section and the foregoing section shall take effect upon the passage of
this act. The remainder of this act shall take effect upon the approval of this act by a majority of
those voting on the question at the election prescribed by the foregoing section
========
LC006382
========
LC006382 - Page 6 of 7